Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-530
Township officers; terms; qualifications; nonpartisan ballot.

After the initial appointments as provided for in sections 23-214 and 23-215, the officers of the township board shall be elected in counties under township government at the statewide general election in 1994 and every four years thereafter. Except for officers first appointed after the county has adopted township organization, the term of each officer shall be four years or until his or her successor is elected and qualified. The three candidates receiving the highest number of votes at the general election shall be the officers of the township board, and the three officers shall determine by majority vote which officer shall serve as township clerk, township treasurer, and chairperson of the township board. The township officers shall meet the qualifications found in sections 23-214 and 23-215. The township officers shall be elected on the nonpartisan ballot.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 126;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 47;

Laws 2003, LB 461, § 2.